Texas, session 891, HB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter D, Chapter 36, Water Code, is amended by adding Section 36.125 to read as follows: Sec. 36.125.  IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY FOR ACTIONS RESTRICTING WELL PRODUCTION. A district is not liable for damages resulting from an action of the district restricting the production of water from a well, including the enforcement of this chapter, the adoption or enforcement of a district rule, or the issuance, renewal, amendment, denial, or enforcement of a permit. SECTION 2.  Section 36.125, Water Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a cause of action that accrues on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.